Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202672-224.03
Condemnation proceedings; procedure; board; membership; appeal; award; filing; effect.

Except as otherwise provided in section 72-222.02, any public body that has or hereafter shall be granted by the Legislature the authority to acquire educational lands for public use shall be required to condemn the interest of the state, as trustee for the public schools, in educational lands in the following manner:

(1) The proceedings shall be had before a board consisting of (a) the superintendent of a school district offering instruction in grades kindergarten through twelve, (b) a certified public accountant, and (c) a credentialed real property appraiser, all appointed by the Governor for a term of six years, except that of the initial appointees one shall serve for a term of two years, one for a term of four years, and one for a term of six years as designated by the Governor. The members of the board shall each receive fifty dollars for each day actually engaged in the performance of official duties and shall be reimbursed for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177 to be paid by the Board of Educational Lands and Funds;

(2) The condemnation proceedings shall be commenced by the filing of a plat and complete description of the lands to be acquired together with an application for that purpose with the secretary of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds. Notice of the pendency of such application and the date of hearing shall be given by serving a copy of the application, together with notice of the date of hearing, upon the Governor and the Attorney General. The date of hearing shall be not less than ten days from the date of the filing of the application;

(3) The condemner and the Board of Educational Lands and Funds may present evidence before the board of appraisers. The board shall have the power to administer oaths and subpoena witnesses at the request of either party or on its own motion;

(4) After hearing the evidence, the board of appraisers shall make the award and file same in the office of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds. Such award may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act; and

(5) Upon payment of the amount of the award by the condemner, it shall be the duty of the secretary of the Board of Educational Lands and Funds to transmit a certified copy of the award to the condemner for filing in the office of the register of deeds in the county or counties where the land is located. The filing of such certified copy of the award shall have the force and effect of a deed of conveyance of the real estate and shall constitute a transfer of the title thereto.

Laws 1949, c. 213, § 1(3), p. 608;

Laws 1951, c. 237, § 1, p. 843;

Laws 1963, Spec. Sess., c. 17, § 3, p. 149;

Laws 1967, c. 466, § 5, p. 1446;

Laws 1969, c. 514, § 7, p. 2106;

Laws 1979, LB 381, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 121, § 1;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 142;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 146;

Laws 1990, LB 1153, § 56;

Laws 1991, LB 203, § 3;

Laws 1994, LB 1107, § 3;

Laws 2006, LB 778, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 78.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.